California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7342.

“Train operator” includes any person that owns, operates, or controls a train and is licensed as a railroad by a state or federal agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 306, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7343.

“Vessel” means a waterborne vessel used for transporting motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 16.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7344.

“Vessel operator” means any person that operates or otherwise controls a vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 17.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7345.

“Tax-paid fuel” or “tax paid” means the gallons of motor vehicle fuel acquired on either a temperature corrected or volumetric basis on which the tax in Section 7360 has been imposed at the time of or prior to the acquisition by the supplier or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 18.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Tax [7360. - 7373.]

7360.

(a) (1) A tax of eighteen cents ($0.18) is hereby imposed upon each gallon of fuel subject to the tax in Sections 7362, 7363, and 7364.

(2) If the federal fuel tax is reduced below the rate of nine cents ($0.09) per gallon and federal financial allocations to this state for highway and exclusive public mass transit
 guideway purposes are reduced or eliminated correspondingly, the tax rate imposed by paragraph (1), on and after the date of the reduction, shall be recalculated by an amount so that the combined state rate under paragraph (1) and the federal tax rate per gallon equal twenty-seven cents ($0.27).

(3) If any person or entity is exempt or partially exempt from the federal fuel tax at the time of a reduction, the person or entity shall continue to be so exempt under this section.

(b) (1) On and after July 1, 2010, in addition to the tax imposed by subdivision (a), a tax is hereby imposed upon each gallon of motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, subject to the tax in Sections 7362, 7363, and 7364 in an amount equal to seventeen and three-tenths cents ($0.173) per gallon.

(2) For the
 2011–12 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the board shall, on or before March 1 of the fiscal year immediately preceding the applicable fiscal year, adjust the rate in paragraph (1) in that manner as to generate an amount of revenue that will equal the amount of revenue loss attributable to the exemption provided by Section 6357.7, based on estimates made by the board, and that rate shall be effective during the state’s next fiscal year.

(3) In order to maintain revenue neutrality for each year, beginning with the rate adjustment on or before March 1, 2012, the adjustment under paragraph (2) shall also take into account the extent to which the actual amount of revenues derived pursuant to this subdivision and, as applicable, Section 7361.1, the revenue loss attributable to the exemption provided by Section 6357.7 resulted in a net revenue gain or loss for the fiscal year ending prior to the rate adjustment date on or before March
 1.

(4) The intent of paragraphs (2) and (3) is to ensure that the act adding this subdivision and Section 6357.7 does not produce a net revenue gain in state taxes.

(5) Commencing July 1, 2019, the adjustments in paragraphs (2) and (3) shall cease, and the rate imposed by this subdivision shall be the rate in paragraph (1).

(c) On and after November 1, 2017, in addition to the taxes imposed by subdivisions (a) and (b), a tax is hereby imposed upon each gallon of motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, subject to the tax in Sections 7362, 7363, and 7364, in an amount equal to twelve cents ($0.12) per gallon.

(d) On July 1, 2020, and every July 1 thereafter, the board shall adjust the taxes imposed by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), with the
 adjustment to apply to both to the base tax rates specified in those provisions and to any previous adjustment in rates made pursuant to this subdivision, by increasing the taxes by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance with the resulting taxes rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one cent ($0.01). The first adjustment pursuant to this subdivision shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from November 1, 2017, to November 1, 2019. Subsequent annual adjustments shall cover subsequent 12 month periods. The incremental change shall be added to the associated rate for that year.

(e) Any increases to the taxes imposed under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) that are enacted by legislation subsequent to July 1, 2017, shall be deemed to be changes to the base tax rates for purposes of the California Consumer Price Index
 calculation and adjustment performed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 25.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7361.

(a) For the privilege of storing, for the purpose of removal, sale, or use, every distributor owning motor vehicle fuel on January 1, 2002, shall pay a tax of eighteen cents ($0.18) for each gallon of motor vehicle fuel according to the volumetric measure thereof, on which a tax has not been imposed under Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) as in effect on December 31, 2001, and tax would have been imposed on any prior removal, entry, or sale of motor vehicle fuel had Sections 7360 to 7363, inclusive, applied to
 motor vehicle fuel for the period before January 1, 2002.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a):

(1) “Storing” includes the possession in a storage facility, except an approved terminal or refinery, of motor vehicle fuel as well as the motor vehicle fuel purchased from and invoiced by the seller prior to January 1, 2002, and in transit on that date.

(2) “Owning” means having title to the motor vehicle fuel.

(3) “Distributor” means any person who was required to be licensed as a distributor under Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) as in effect on December 31, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7361.1.

(a) For the privilege of storing, for the purpose of sale, each supplier, wholesaler, and retailer owning 1,000 or more gallons of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, on July 1, 2010, shall pay a storage tax of seventeen and three-tenths cents ($0.173) per gallon of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, in storage according to the volumetric measure
 thereof.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Owning” means having title to the motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline.

(2) “Retailer” means any person who sells motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, in this state to a person who subsequently uses the motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline.

(3) “Storing” includes the ownership or possession of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, outside of the bulk transfer or terminal system, including the holding of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, for sale at wholesale or retail locations stored in a container of any kind, including railroad tank cars and trucks or trailer cargo tanks. “Storing” also includes tax-paid motor vehicle
 fuel, other than aviation gasoline, purchased from and invoiced by the seller, and tax-paid motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline removed from a terminal or entered into by a supplier, prior to the date specified in subdivision (a) and in transit on that date.

(4) “Wholesaler” means any person who sells motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline, in this state for resale to a retailer or to a person who is not a retailer and subsequently uses the motor vehicle fuel, other than aviation gasoline.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 6, Sec. 26.   (AB 105)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7361.2.

(a) For the privilege of storing, for the purpose of sale, each supplier, wholesaler, and retailer owning 1,000 or more gallons of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel on November 1, 2017, shall pay a storage tax, the rate of which shall be determined by the board pursuant to the difference in the rate of the tax on motor vehicle fuel in effect on October 31, 2017, and the rate in effect on November 1, 2017, on tax-paid motor vehicle fuel in storage according to the
 volumetric measure thereof.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Owning” means having title to the motor vehicle fuel.

(2) “Retailer” means any person who sells motor vehicle fuel in this state to a person who subsequently uses the motor vehicle fuel.

(3) “Storing” includes the ownership or possession of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel outside of the bulk transfer/terminal system, including the holding of tax-paid motor vehicle fuel for sale at wholesale or retail locations stored in a container of any kind, including railroad tank cars and trucks or trailer cargo tanks. “Storing” also includes tax-paid motor vehicle fuel purchased from and invoiced by the seller, and tax-paid motor vehicle fuel removed from a terminal or entered into by a supplier, prior
 to the date specified in subdivision (a) and in transit on that date.

(4) “Wholesaler” means any person who sells diesel fuel in this state for resale to a retailer or to a person who is not a retailer and subsequently uses the motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 26.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7362.

The tax specified in Section 7360 is imposed on the removal of motor vehicle fuel in this state from a terminal if the motor vehicle fuel is removed at the rack.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7363.

The tax specified in Section 7360 is also imposed on all of the following:

(a) The removal of motor vehicle fuel in this state from any refinery if either of the following applies:

(1) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of the motor vehicle fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensed supplier.

(2) The removal
 is at the refinery rack.

(b) The entry of motor vehicle fuel into this state for sale, consumption, use, or warehousing if either of the following applies:

(1) The entry is by bulk transfer and the enterer is not a licensed supplier.

(2) The entry is not by bulk transfer.

(c) The removal or sale of motor vehicle fuel in this state to an unlicensed person unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the motor vehicle fuel.

(d) The removal or sale of blended motor vehicle fuel in this state by the blender thereof. The number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of blended motor vehicle fuel removed or
 sold and the number of gallons of previously taxed motor vehicle fuel used to produce the blended motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7364.

The tax specified in Section 7360 is imposed as a backup tax as follows:

(a) On the delivery into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle of:

(1) Any motor vehicle fuel on which a claim for refund has been allowed; or

(2) Any liquid on which tax has not been imposed by this part, Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), or
 Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001). 

(b) On the sale of any motor vehicle fuel on which a claim for refund has been allowed.

(c) On the sale and delivery into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle fuel-powered highway vehicle of any liquid on which tax has not been imposed by this part, Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), or Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 19.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7365.

Any person that produces blended motor vehicle fuel outside the bulk transfer/terminal system (the blender) shall pay tax as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 7363.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7366.

Every enterer shall pay tax on motor vehicle fuel imported into this state as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 7363.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7367.

Every highway vehicle operator/fueler is liable for the backup tax imposed under Section 7364.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7368.

Every position holder shall pay the tax on the removal of motor vehicle fuel from a terminal as provided in Section 7362.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7369.

Every refiner shall pay tax on the removal of motor vehicle fuel from a refinery as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 7363.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7370.

The terminal operator is jointly and severally liable for the tax imposed under Section 7362 if both of the following apply:

(a) The position holder with respect to the motor vehicle fuel is a person other than the terminal operator and is not a licensed supplier.

(b) The terminal operator has not met the conditions of Section 7371.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7371.

A terminal operator is not liable for tax under Section 7370, if at the time of the removal, all of the following apply:

(a) The terminal operator is a licensed supplier.

(b) The terminal operator has an unexpired notification certificate from the position holder as required by the Internal Revenue Service.

(c) The terminal operator has no reason
 to believe that any information in the certificate is false.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7372.

(a) The board may accept from the person who receives motor vehicle fuel removed at a refinery or terminal rack an amount equal to the tax due and required to be paid by the refiner or positionholder upon the removal of the motor vehicle fuel from a refinery or terminal rack, as if the amount were payment of the tax by the refiner or positionholder under Section 7362 or 7363, as the case may be, if the Internal Revenue Service authorizes payment of federal fuel taxes by the receiving party under a two-party
 exchange agreement or similar arrangement.

(b) The refiner or positionholder shall remain primarily liable for payment of the tax imposed by Section 7362 or 7363 for motor vehicle fuel removed at the refinery or terminal rack, as the case may be, plus any penalty or interest, until the amount is finally paid and credited to the account of the responsible refiner or positionholder; provided, however, that the board, at its discretion, may relieve the refiner or positionholder from primary liability for payment of tax imposed by Section 7362 or 7363 and hold another person primarily liable for the tax if (1) the Internal Revenue Service authorizes payment of fuel taxes by the receiving party under a two-party exchange agreement, and (2) under the Internal Revenue Service approach to two-party exchange agreements, another person is primarily liable for payment of the tax, and (3) the board elects to follow the Internal Revenue Service
 approach.

(c) The board may adopt those regulations as it deems appropriate to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 20.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7373.

(a) For the purpose of the proper administration of this part and to prevent evasion of the tax, unless the contrary is established, it shall be presumed that all motor vehicle fuel received at a terminal in this state, imported into this state, or refined and placed into storage for removal at a refinery in this state or blended motor vehicle fuel blended or converted in this state and no longer in the possession of the supplier has been removed or sold by the supplier.

(b) The presumption shall not apply if the supplier proves to the satisfaction of the board that both:

(1) The supplier has exercised ordinary care in entrusting control or possession of the motor vehicle fuel to another person.

(2) The person to whom the supplier has entrusted the control or possession of the motor vehicle fuel as bailee, consignee, employee, or agent, caused a removal or sale by the act of converting to that person’s own use the motor vehicle fuel so entrusted to that person by the supplier.

(c) If the supplier proves to the satisfaction of the board, the existence of both of the circumstances in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), then the person who converted the motor vehicle fuel to his or her own use, as well as any other person
 receiving that motor vehicle fuel with the knowledge that it was so converted, shall be liable for payment of the tax imposed upon that removal or sale, and all of those persons shall be considered as suppliers for the purpose of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 7651) or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 7851) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 21.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Aircraft Jet Fuel Tax [7385. - 7398.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [7385. - 7391.]

7385.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7386.

“Aircraft” means any powered contrivance designed for navigation in the air except a rocket or missile.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7387.

“Aircraft jet fuel” means any inflammable liquid which is used or sold for use in propelling aircraft operated by the jet or turbine type of engine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7388.

“Aircraft jet fuel dealer” means any person who sells to an aircraft jet fuel user, aircraft jet fuel delivered in this state into the fuel tanks of aircraft or into a storage facility from which the fuel is withdrawn for use in aircraft.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7389.

“Aircraft jet fuel user” means any person who uses aircraft jet fuel for the propulsion of an aircraft in this state except the following:

(a) A common carrier by air engaged in the business of transporting persons or property for hire or compensation under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued pursuant to the authority of the laws of this state, of the United States, or of any foreign government.

(b) A person engaged in the business of constructing or reconstructing by manufacture or assembly of completed aircraft, or modifying, overhauling, repairing, maintaining, or servicing of aircraft.

(c) The armed forces of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7390.

“Fuel tank” means any receptacle on an aircraft from which fuel is supplied for the propulsion of the aircraft.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7391.

“Use” means the placing of aircraft jet fuel into the fuel tank of an aircraft in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Imposition of Tax [7392. - 7394.]

7392.

For the privilege of using or selling aircraft jet fuel a tax is imposed upon every aircraft jet fuel dealer at the rate of two cents ($0.02) for each gallon of that fuel sold to an aircraft jet fuel user or used by the dealer as an aircraft jet fuel user.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7393.

The aircraft jet fuel dealer shall make a return of the tax due under Section 7392 as required of suppliers under Section 7651. All of the provisions of this part relating to the collection of the tax shall be applicable to the collection of the tax imposed by Section 7392.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7394.

If a person certifies in writing to an aircraft jet fuel dealer that the sale or use of aircraft jet fuel purchased by him or her is not subject to the tax imposed by Section 7392 and the person uses the fuel as an aircraft jet fuel user, the person shall be liable for payment of the tax imposed by Section 7392 as if he or she were an aircraft jet fuel dealer making taxable sales of aircraft jet fuel at the time of that use and the number of gallons of fuel so used shall be deemed the number of gallons sold by him or
 her.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Permit [7395. - 7396.]

7395.

Every person desiring to become an aircraft jet fuel dealer shall first secure from the board an aircraft jet fuel dealer permit. Applications for permits shall be made to the board on forms prescribed by the board. Before issuing the permit the board may require the applicant to furnish the bond required under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7451).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7396.

Upon receipt of the application and after the deposit of such bond as the board may require, the board shall issue to the applicant an aircraft jet fuel dealer permit authorizing the applicant to become a dealer in aircraft jet fuel. The permit is valid until canceled, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administrative Provisions [7397. - 7397.]

7397.

All of the administrative provisions of this part not inconsistent with this chapter shall be applicable to the administration of the tax imposed by Section 7392.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disposition of Proceeds [7398. - 7398.]

7398.

All money received in payment of the tax imposed by this chapter shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, and after the payment of any refunds authorized by this part, the balance remaining shall be transferred to the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund for allocation pursuant to Section 8352.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Exemptions [7401. - 7405.]

7401.

(a) The provisions of this part requiring the payment of motor vehicle fuel taxes do not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of motor vehicle fuel transferred in bulk to a refinery or terminal if the persons involved (including the terminal operator) are licensed suppliers.

(2) The removal of motor vehicle fuel, if all of the following
 apply:

(A) The motor vehicle fuel is removed by railroad car from an approved refinery and is received at an approved terminal.

(B) The refinery and the terminal are operated by the same licensed supplier.

(C) The refinery is not served by pipeline (other than a pipeline for the receipt of crude oil) or vessel.

(3) Motor vehicle fuel which, pursuant to the contract of sale, is required to be shipped and is shipped to a point outside of this state by a supplier by means of any of the following:

(A) Facilities operated by the supplier.

(B) Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or forwarding agency, whether
 hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment to the out-of-state point.

(C) Delivery by the supplier to any vessel clearing from a port of this state for a port outside of this state and actually exported from this state in the vessel.

(4) Motor vehicle fuel sold by credit card certified by the United States Department of State to any consulate officer or consulate employee of a foreign government who is not engaged in any private occupation for gain within this state, who uses the motor vehicle fuel in a motor vehicle that is registered with the United States Department of State, and whose government has done either of the following:

(A) Entered into a treaty with the United States providing for the exemption of its representatives from national, state, and municipal taxes.

(B) Granted a similar exemption to representatives of the United States.

(5) Motor vehicle fuel sold to the United States armed forces for use in ships or aircraft, or for use outside this state.

(6) Gasoline blendstocks removed from a pipeline or vessel, when the gasoline blendstocks are received by a licensed industrial user.

(7) Any entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of gasoline blendstocks that are received at an approved terminal or refinery if the person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensed supplier.

(8) Any entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of gasoline blendstocks not in connection with a sale if the person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensed supplier and
 the person does not use the gasoline blendstocks to produce finished gasoline.

(9) Any entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of gasoline blendstocks in connection with a sale if the person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensed supplier and at the time of sale, such person has an unexpired exemption certificate described in Section 7402 from the buyer and has no reason to believe any information in the certificate is false.

(10) If paragraph (8) or (9) applied to the removal or entry of gasoline blendstocks, any resale made of gasoline blendstocks, when the person has an unexpired exemption certificate described in Section 7402 from the buyer and has no reason to believe any information in the certificate is false.

(11) Motor vehicle fuel sold by a supplier to a train operator for use in a motor vehicle
 fuel-powered train or for other off-highway use and the supplier has on hand an exemption certificate described in Section 7403 from the train operator.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Carrier” means a person or firm engaged in the business of transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and includes both common and contract carriers.

(2) “Forwarding agent” means a person or firm engaged in the business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its shipment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7402.

(a) The certificate to be provided by a buyer of gasoline blendstocks consists of a statement that is signed under penalty of perjury by a person with authority to bind the buyer. A new certificate must be given if any information in the current certificate changes. The certificate may be included as part of any business records normally used to document a sale. The certificate expires on the earliest of the following dates:

(1) The date one year after
 the effective date of the certificate.

(2) The date a new certificate is provided by the buyer to the seller.

(b) An exemption certificate for gasoline blendstocks that states that the blendstocks will not be used to produce finished gasoline shall contain that information and be in the form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.

(a) The certificate to be provided by a train operator consists of a statement that is signed under penalties of perjury by a person with authority to bind the buyer. A new certificate must be given if any information in the current certificate changes. The certificate may be included as part of any business records normally used to document a sale.

(b) An exemption certificate for motor vehicle fuel used in a motor vehicle fuel-powered train or for
 other off-highway use shall contain that information and be in the form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.1.

Prior to issuing an exemption certificate as provided in Section 7403, the train operator shall obtain a license from the board. Every application for a license shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of his or her place or places of business, and such other information as the board may require. The application shall be signed by the owner if a natural person; in the case of an association or partnership, by a member
 or partner; in the case of a corporation, by an executive officer or some person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7403.2.

(a) For the privilege of purchasing motor vehicle fuel exempt from taxes under paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 7401, each train operator must make a report to the board showing:

(1) The name and license number of the supplier from whom it purchased motor vehicle fuel and the number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel purchased that is exempt from the tax.

(2) Any other information required by the
 board.

(b) Each train operator shall prepare and file with the board a report in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media showing the information in subdivision (a) during each quarterly reporting period. The report shall be filed with the board on or before the last day of the month following the close of the quarterly period to which it relates. To facilitate the administration of this part, the board may require the filing of these reports for other than quarterly periods. Reports shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(c) All of the administrative provisions of this part relating to a supplier shall be applicable to a train operator.

(d) The board may revoke the train operator’s license provided for in
 Section 7403.1 due to the filing of inaccurate or improper reports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7404.

If a purchaser gives an exemption certificate for motor vehicle fuel pursuant to this chapter to the effect that the motor vehicle fuel purchased will be used in an exempt manner, and sells the motor vehicle fuel or uses the motor vehicle fuel in some other manner or for some other purpose, the purchaser will be liable for payment of the tax under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7360) of this part. The tax, applicable penalties, and interest shall become due and payable and shall be ascertained and determined in the same manner as
 the backup tax under Section 7727.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 22.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7405.

(a) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who gives an exemption certificate pursuant to this chapter for motor vehicle fuel that he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be used by him or her or the corporation in an exempt manner, for the purpose of evading payment of the amount of the tax applicable to the transaction, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 8405.

(b) Any person, including
 any officer or employee of a corporation, who gives an exemption certificate for motor vehicle fuel pursuant to this chapter that he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be used by him or her or the corporation in an exempt manner, is liable to the state for the amount of tax that would be due if he or she had not given that certificate. In addition to the tax, the person shall be liable to the state for a penalty of 25 percent of the tax or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater, for each certificate issued for personal gain or to evade the payment of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 23.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Licenses and Bonds [7451. - 7520.]



  ARTICLE 1. License for Supplier [7451. - 7453.]

7451.

Every person before becoming a supplier shall apply to the board for a license authorizing the person to engage in business as a supplier on forms prescribed by the board. A supplier’s license shall be issued only to a person who is a supplier of motor vehicle fuel as defined in Section 7338. It is unlawful for any person to be a supplier without first securing a license.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7452.

Applications shall be made on forms to be prescribed, prepared, and furnished by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7453.

Before granting a license authorizing a person to engage in business as a supplier, the board may require the person to file with the board security pursuant to Section 7486. The license issued to any supplier is not transferable and is valid until canceled or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 24.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. License for Industrial User [7460. - 7460.]

7460.

Every person before becoming an industrial user shall apply to the board for a license authorizing the person to operate as an industrial user on forms prescribed by the board. An industrial user license shall be issued only to a person who is an industrial user of motor vehicle fuel as defined in Section 7322. It is unlawful for a person to act as an industrial user without first securing a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. License for Pipeline Operator, Train Operator, and Vessel Operator [7470. - 7470.]

7470.

Every person before becoming a pipeline operator or a vessel operator shall apply to the board for a license on forms prescribed by the board. In addition, every train operator that transports motor vehicle fuel, alcohol, or aircraft jet fuel into, out of, or within this state shall obtain a license from the board on forms prescribed by the board. A pipeline operator license, a train operator license, or a vessel operator license shall be issued only to a person who is a pipeline operator, a train operator, or a vessel operator as defined in Sections 7331,
 7342, and 7344. It is unlawful for a person to act as a pipeline operator or a vessel operator without first securing a license. It is unlawful for a train operator to transport motor vehicle fuel, alcohol, or aircraft jet fuel into, out of, or within this state on or after January 1, 2009, without first securing a license under this section or Section 7403.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 306, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bonds [7486. - 7487.]

7486.

The board, whenever it deems it necessary to ensure compliance with this part or any rule or regulation adopted under this part, may require any person to deposit with it any security as it may determine appropriate. The amount of the security shall be fixed by the board but shall not be more than three times the estimated average monthly tax liability of the person. The total amount of security shall not be in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) where the person has established to the satisfaction of the board that this